 Chapter 2 New World Experiments: England’s Seventeenth-Century Colonies

Profit and Piety: Competing
Visions for English Settlement
 In the spring of 1644, John Winthrop, governor of Massachusetts Bay, learned that Native Americans had overrun the scattered tobacco plantations of Virginia, killing as many as five hundred colonists. Winthrop never thought much of the Chesapeake settlements. He regarded the people who had migrated to that part of America as grossly materialistic, and because Virginia had recently expelled several Puritan ministers, Winthrop decided the hostilities were God’s way of punishing the tobacco planters for their worldliness. “It was observable,” he related, “that this massacre came upon them soon after they had driven out the godly ministers we had sent to them.” When Virginians appealed to Massachusetts for military supplies, they received a cool reception. “We were weakly provided ourselves,” Winthrop explained, “and so could not afford them any help of that kind.” In 1675, the tables turned. Native Americans declared all-out war against the New Englanders, and

 soon reports of the destruction of Puritan communities were circulating in Virginia. “The Indians in New England have burned Considerable Villages,” wrote one leading tobacco planter, “and have made them [the New Englanders] desert more than one hundred and fifty miles of those places they had formerly seated.” Sir William Berkeley, Virginia’s royal governor, was not displeased by news of New England’s adversity. He and his friends held the Puritans in contempt. Indeed, the New Englanders reminded them of the religious fanatics who had provoked civil war in England and who in 1649 had executed Charles I. During this particular crisis, Berkeley noted that he might have shown more pity for the beleaguered New Englanders “had they deserved it of the King.” The governor, sounding like a Puritan himself, described the warring Indians as the “Instruments” with which God intended “to destroy the King’s Enemies.” For good measure, Virginia outlawed the export of foodstuffs to their embattled northern neighbors.

 In 1608, Powhatan, the father of Pocahontas, gave this shell-decorated ceremonial cloak to Captain Christopher Newport, commander of the fleet that brought the first English settlers to Jamestown.



CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

 uch extraordinary disunity in the colonies—not to mention lack of compassion—comes as a surprise to anyone searching for the roots of modern nationalism in this early period. English colonization in the seventeenth century did not spring from a desire to build a centralized empire in the New World similar to that of Spain or France. Instead, the English crown awarded colonial charters to a wide variety of entrepreneurs, religious idealists, and aristocratic adventurers who established separate and profoundly different colonies. Not only did New Englanders have little in common with the earliest Virginians and Carolinians, but they were often divided among themselves. Migration itself helps to explain this striking competition and diversity. At different times, different colonies appealed to different sorts of people. Men and women moved to the New World for various reasons, and as economic, political, and religious conditions changed on both sides of the Atlantic during the course of the seventeenth century, so too did patterns of English migration.

S


Breaking Away
 What were some of the social problems facing Britain in the 16th and 17th centuries that helped push English colonists to cross the Atlantic? English people in the early decades of the seventeenth century experienced what seemed to them an accelerating pace of social change. What was most evident was the rapid growth of population. Between 1580 and 1650, a period during which many men and women elected to journey to the New World, the population of England expanded from about 3.5 million to more than 5 million. Among other things, the expansion strained the nation’s agrarian economy. Competition for food and land drove up prices, and people desperate for work took to the roads. Those migrants, many of them drawn into the orbit of London by tales of opportunity, frightened the traditional leaders of English society. To the propertied class, the wandering poor represented a threat to good order, and, particularly during the early decades of the seventeenth century, landholders urged local magistrates throughout the kingdom to enforce the laws against vagrancy. Even by modern standards, the English population of this period was quite mobile. To be sure, most men and women lived out their days rooted in the tiny country villages of their birth. A growing number of English people, however, were migrant laborers who took seasonal work. Many others relocated from the countryside to London, already a city of several hundred thousand inhabitants by the early seventeenth century. Because health conditions in London were poor, a large number of the new arrivals quickly died, and had their places not been taken by other migrants from the rural villages, the population of London would almost certainly have decreased. Other, more exotic destinations also beckoned. A large number of English settlers migrated to Ireland, while lucrative employment and religious freedom attracted people to Holland. The Pilgrims, people who separated themselves from the established Church of England, initially hoped to make a new life in Leyden. The migrations within Europe serve as reminders that ordinary people had

 choices. A person who was upset about the state of the Church of England or who had lost a livelihood did not have to move to America. That some men and women consciously selected this much more dangerous and expensive journey set them apart from their contemporaries. English colonists crossed the Atlantic for many reasons. Some wanted to institute a purer form of worship, more closely based on their interpretation of Scripture. Others dreamed of owning land and improving their social position. A few came to the New World to escape bad marriages, jail terms, or the dreary prospect of lifelong poverty. Since most seventeenth-century migrants, especially those who transferred to the Chesapeake colonies, left almost no records of their previous lives in England, it is futile to try to isolate a single cause or explanation for their decision to leave home. Whatever their reasons for crossing the ocean, English migrants to America in this period left a nation wracked by recurrent, often violent, political and religious controversy. During the 1620s, autocratic Stuart monarchs—James I (r. 1603–1625) and his son Charles I (r. 1625–1649)—who succeeded Queen Elizabeth on the English throne fought constantly with the elected members of Parliament. At stake were rival notions of constitutional and representative government. Many royal policies—the granting of lucrative commercial monopolies to court favorites, for example—fueled popular discontent, but the crown’s hostility to far-reaching religious reform sparked the most vocal protest. Throughout the kingdom, Puritans became adamant in their demand for radical purification of ritual. Tensions grew so severe that in 1629, Charles attempted to rule the country without Parliament’s assistance. The autocratic strategy backfired. When Charles finally was forced to recall Parliament in 1640 because he was running out of money, Parliament demanded major constitutional reforms. Militant Puritans, supported by many members of Parliament, insisted on restructuring the church—abolishing the office of bishop was high on their list. In this angry political atmosphere, Charles took up arms against the supporters of Parliament. The confrontation between Royalists and Parliamentarians set off a long and bloody conflict, known as the English Civil War. In 1649, the victorious Parliamentarians beheaded Charles, and for almost a decade, Oliver Cromwell, a skilled general and committed Puritan, governed England as Lord Protector. In 1660, following Cromwell’s death from natural causes, the Stuarts returned to the English throne. During a period known as the Restoration, neither Charles II (r. 1660–1685) nor James II (r. 1685–1688)—both sons of Charles I—was able to establish genuine political stability. When the authoritarian James lifted some of the restrictions governing Catholics, a Protestant nation rose up in what the English people called the Glorious Revolution (1688) and sent James into permanent exile. The Glorious Revolution altered the course of English political history and, therefore, that of the American colonies as well. The monarchs who followed James II surrendered some of the prerogative powers that had destabilized English politics for almost a century. The crown was still a potent force in the political life of the nation, but never again would an English king or queen attempt to govern without Parliament.

The Chesapeake: Dreams of Wealth


THE STUART MONARCHS
James I (r. 1603 –1625) 
Charles I
 (r. 1625 – executed 1649)

James II
 (r. 1685 – deposed 1688)

Charles II
 (r. 1660 – 1685)

William III
Prince of Orange
 (r. 1688 –1702)

 m.

Mary II
 (r. 1688 – 1695)



 New World. These advocates argued that the North American mainland contained resources of incalculable value. An innovative group, they insisted, might reap great profits and at the same time supply England with raw materials that it would otherwise be forced to purchase from European rivals: Holland, France, and Spain. Moreover, any enterprise that annoyed Catholic Spain or revealed its weakness in America seemed a desirable end in itself to patriotic English Protestants. Anti-Catholicism and hatred of Spain became an integral part of English national identity during this period, and unless one appreciates just how deeply those sentiments ran in the popular mind, one cannot fully understand

Anne I
 (r. 1702 – 1714)

View the Map The Colonies to 1740


 Such political events, coupled with periodic economic recession and religious repression, determined, in large measure, the direction and flow of migration to America. During times of political turmoil, religious persecution, and economic insecurity, men and women thought more seriously about transferring to the New World than they did during periods of peace and prosperity. Obviously, people who moved to America at different times came from different social and political environments. A person who emigrated to Pennsylvania in the 1680s, for example, left an England unlike the one that a Virginian in 1607 or a Bay Colonist in 1630 might have known. Moreover, the young men and women who migrated to London in search of work and who then, in their frustration and poverty, decided to move to the Chesapeake carried a very different set of memories from those people who moved directly to New England from the small rural villages of their homeland. Regardless of the exact timing of departure, English settlers brought with them ideas and assumptions that helped them make sense of their everyday experiences in an unfamiliar environment. Their values were tested and sometimes transformed in the New World, but they were seldom destroyed. Settlement involved a complex process of adjustment. The colonists developed different subcultures in America, and in each it is possible to trace the interaction between the settlers’ values and the physical elements, such as the climate, crops, and soil, of their new surroundings. The Chesapeake, the New England colonies, the Middle Colonies, and the Southern Colonies formed distinct regional identities that have survived to the present day.

Susquehannock
 re wa la De

 Lenni-lenape (Delaware)

 MARYLAND

 ar law De

Conoy
Po
 to Severn m ac R. R.

 e Ba

 y

 no an ah pp Ra

 ck

R.


Nanticoke
R.


R.
Parnunkey


 eake Bay esap

Jam
 es

Ch


 St. Mary's City

Jamestown
Nottoway


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

 VIRGINIA

Tutelo
Tuscarora


Pamlico


The Chesapeake: Dreams of Wealth
 Why did the Chesapeake colonies not prosper during the earliest years of settlement? After the Roanoke debacle in 1590, English interest in American settlement declined, and only a few aging visionaries such as Richard Hakluyt kept alive the dream of colonies in the





 50 miles 100 kilometers

CHESAPEAKE COLONIES, 1640
The many deep rivers flowing into the Chesapeake Bay provided scattered English planters with a convenient transportation system, linking them directly to European markets. 


CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

 why ordinary people who had no direct financial stake in the New World so generously supported English efforts to colonize America. Soon after James I ascended to the throne, adventurers were given an opportunity to put their theories into practice in the colonies of Virginia and Maryland, an area known as the Chesapeake, or somewhat later, as the Tobacco Coast.

Entrepreneurs in Virginia
 During Elizabeth’s reign, the major obstacle to successful colonization of the New World had been raising money. No single person, no matter how rich or well connected, could underwrite the vast expenses a New World settlement required. The solution to this financial problem was the joint-stock company, a business organization in which scores of people could invest without fear of bankruptcy. A merchant or landowner could purchase a share of stock at a stated price, and at the end of several years the investor could anticipate recovering the initial amount plus a portion of whatever profits the company had made. Joint-stock ventures sprang up like mushrooms. Affluent English citizens, and even some of more modest fortunes, rushed to invest in the companies and, as a result, some projects were able to amass large amounts of capital, enough certainly to launch a new colony in Virginia. On April 10, 1606, James issued the first Virginia charter. The document authorized the London Company to establish plantations in Virginia. The London Company was an ambitious business venture. Its leader, Sir Thomas Smith, was reputedly London’s wealthiest merchant. Smith and his partners gained possession of the territory lying between present-day North Carolina and the Hudson River. These were generous but vague boundaries, to be sure, but the Virginia Company—as the London Company soon called itself—set out immediately to find the treasures Hakluyt had promised. In December 1606, the Susan Constant, the Godspeed, and the Discovery sailed for America. The ships carried 104 men and boys who had been instructed to establish a fortified outpost somehundred miles up a large navigable river. The natural beauty and economic potential of the region was apparent to everyone. A voyager on the expedition reported seeing “faire meaddowes and goodly tall trees, with such fresh waters running through the woods, as almost ravished [us] at first sight.” The leaders of the colony selected—without consulting resident Native Americans—what the Europeans considered a promising location more than thirty miles from the mouth of the James River. A marshy peninsula jutting out into the river became the site for one of America’s most unsuccessful villages, Jamestown. Modern historians have criticized the choice, for the low-lying ground proved to be a disease-ridden death trap; even the drinking water was contaminated with salt. But the first Virginians were neither stupid nor suicidal. Jamestown seemed the ideal place to build a fort, since surprise attack by Spaniards or Native Americans rather than sickness appeared the more serious threat in the early months of settlement. Almost immediately, dispirited colonists began quarreling. The adventurers were not prepared for the challenges that confronted them in America. Part of the problem was cultural. Most of them had grown up in a depressed agricultural economy that

 could not provide full-time employment for all who wanted it. In England, laborers shared what little work was available. One man, for example, might perform a certain chore while others simply watched. Later, the men who had been idle were given an opportunity to work for an hour or two. This labor system may have been appropriate for England, but in Virginia it nearly destroyed the colony. Adventurers sat around Jamestown while other men performed crucial agricultural tasks. It made little sense, of course, to share work in an environment in which people were starving because too little labor was expended on the planting and harvesting of crops. Not surprisingly, some modern historians—those who assumed all workers should put in an eight-hour day—branded the early Virginians as lazy, irresponsible beings who preferred to play while others labored. In point of fact, however, the first settlers were merely attempting to replicate a traditional work experience. Avarice exacerbated the problems. The adventurers had traveled to the New World in search of the sort of instant wealth they imagined the Spaniards to have found in Mexico and Peru. Published tales of rubies and diamonds lying on the beach probably inflamed their expectations. Even when it must have been apparent that such expectations were unfounded, the first settlers often behaved in Virginia as if they fully expected to become rich. Instead of cooperating for the common good—guarding or farming, for example—individuals pursued personal interests. They searched for gold when they might have helped plant corn. No one was willing to take orders, and those who were supposed to govern the colony looked after their private welfare while disease, war, and starvation ravaged the settlement.

Spinning Out of Control
 Virginia might have gone the way of Roanoke had it not been for Captain John Smith. By any standard, he was a resourceful man. Before coming to Jamestown, he had traveled throughout Europe and fought with the Hungarian army against the Turks—and, if Smith is to be believed, he was saved from certain death by various beautiful women. Because of his reputation for boasting, historians have discounted Smith’s account of life in early Virginia. Recent scholarship, however, has affirmed the truthfulness of his curious story. In Virginia, Smith brought order out of anarchy. While members of the council in Jamestown debated petty politics, he traded with the local Indians for food, mapped the Chesapeake Bay, and may even have been rescued from execution by a young Indian girl, Pocahontas. In the fall of 1608, he seized control of the ruling council and instituted a tough military discipline. Under Smith, no one enjoyed special privilege. Individuals whom he forced to work came to hate him. But he managed to keep them alive, no small achievement in such a deadly environment. Leaders of the Virginia Company in London recognized the need to reform the entire enterprise. After all, they had spent considerable sums and had received nothing in return. In 1609, the company directors obtained a new charter from the king, which completely reorganized the Virginia government. Henceforth all commercial and political decisions affecting the colonists rested with the company, a fact that had not been made sufficiently clear in the 1606 charter. Moreover, in

The Chesapeake: Dreams of Wealth


Read the Document


John Smith, “The Starving


Time”


 John Smith (c. 1580–1630) was a professional mercenary and adventurer who fought against both the Spanish and the Ottomans before being hired by the Virginia Company to assist in the establishment of its new colony at Jamestown.

 an effort to raise scarce capital, the original partners opened the joint-stock company to the general public. For a little more than £12—approximately one year’s wages for an unskilled English laborer—a person or group of persons could purchase a stake in Virginia. It was anticipated that in 1616 the profits from the colony would be distributed among the shareholders. The company sponsored a publicity campaign; pamphlets and sermons extolled the colony’s potential and exhorted patriotic English citizens to invest in the enterprise. Between 1609 and 1611, the remaining Virginia settlers lacked capable leadership, and perhaps as a result, they lacked food. The terrible winter of 1609–1610 was termed the “starving time.” A few desperate colonists were driven to cannibalism, an ironic situation since early explorers had assumed that only Native Americans would eat human flesh. In England, Smith heard that one colonist had killed his wife, powdered [salted] her, and “had eaten part of her before it was known; for which he was executed.” The captain, who possessed



 a droll sense of humor, observed, “Now, whether she was better roasted, broiled, or carbonadoed [sliced], I know not, but such a dish as powdered wife I never heard of.” Other people simply lost the will to live. The presence of so many Native Americans heightened the danger. The first colonists found themselves living—or attempting to live—in territory controlled by what was probably the most powerful Indian confederation east of the Mississippi River. Under the leadership of their werowance, Powhatan, these Indians had by 1608 created a loose association of some thirty tribes, and when Captain John Smith arrived to lead several hundred adventurers, the Powhatans (named for their king) numbered some fourteen thousand people, of whom thirty-two hundred were warriors. These people hoped initially to enlist the Europeans as allies against native enemies. When it became clear that the two groups, holding such different notions about labor and property and about the exploitation of the natural environment, could not coexist in peace, the Powhatans tried to drive the invaders out of Virginia, once in 1622 and again in 1644. The failure of the second campaign ended in the complete destruction of the Powhatan empire. In June 1610, the settlers who had survived despite starvation and conflicts with the Indians actually abandoned Virginia. Through a stroke of luck, however, they encountered a small fleet led by the colony’s governor, the Baron De La Warr, just as they commenced their voyage down the James River. De La Warr and the deputy governors who succeeded him, Sir Thomas Gates and Sir Thomas Dale, ruled by martial law. The new colonists, many of them male and female servants employed by the company, were marched to work by the beat of the drum. Such methods saved the colony but could not make it flourish. In 1616, company shareholders received no profits. Their only reward was the right to a piece of unsurveyed land located three thousand miles from London.

“Stinking Weed”
 The economic solution to Virginia’s problems grew in the vacant lots of Jamestown. Only Indians bothered to cultivate tobacco until John Rolfe, a settler who achieved notoriety by marrying Pocahontas, realized this local weed might be a valuable export. Rolfe experimented with the crop, eventually growing in Virginia a milder variety that had been developed in the West Indies and was more appealing to European smokers. Virginians suddenly possessed a means to make money. Tobacco proved relatively easy to grow, and settlers who had avoided work now threw themselves into its production with single-minded diligence. In 1617, one observer found that Jamestown’s “streets and all other spare places [are] planted with tobacco . . . the Colony dispersed all about planting tobacco.” Although King James I originally considered smoking immoral and unhealthy, he changed his mind when the duties he collected on tobacco imports began to mount. He was neither the first nor the last ruler who decided a vice that generates revenue is not really so bad. The company sponsored another ambitious effort to transform Virginia into a profitable enterprise. In 1618, Sir Edwin



CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

Read the Document


James I, “A Counterblaste


 to Tobacco”

 This tobacco label advertises Virginia’s valuable export—tobacco. Despite King James’s initial attitude toward the “stinking weed,” once the government saw that tobacco made a profit, it dropped its moral criticism of the American crop.

 Sandys (pronounced Sands) led a faction of stockholders that began to pump life into the dying organization by instituting a series of sweeping reforms and eventually ousting Sir Thomas Smith and his friends. Sandys wanted private investors to develop their own estates in Virginia. Before 1618, there had been little incentive to do so, but by relaxing Dale’s martial law and promising an elective representative assembly called the House of Burgesses, Sandys thought he could make the colony more attractive to wealthy speculators. Even more important was Sandys’s method for distributing land. Colonists who covered their own transportation cost to America were guaranteed a headright, a 50-acre lot for which they paid only a small annual rent. Adventurers were granted additional headrights for each servant they brought to the colony. This procedure allowed prosperous planters to build up huge estates while they also acquired dependent laborers. This land system persisted long after the company’s collapse. So too did the notion that the wealth of a few justified the exploitation many others.

Time of Reckoning
 Between 1619 and 1622, colonists arrived in Virginia in record number. Company records reveal that during this short period, 3,570 individuals were sent to the colony. People seldom moved to Virginia in families. Although the first women arrived in Jamestown in 1608, most emigrants were single males in their teens or early twenties who came to the New World as indentured

 servants. In exchange for transportation across the Atlantic, they agreed to serve a master for a stated number of years. The length of service depended in part on the age of the servant. The younger the servant, the longer he or she served. In return, the master promised to give the laborers proper care and, at the conclusion of their contracts, to provide them with tools and clothes according to “the custom of the country.” Powerful Virginians corrupted the system. Poor servants wanted to establish independent tobacco farms. As they discovered, however, headrights were awarded not to the newly freed servant, but to the great planter who had borne the cost of the servant’s transportation to the New World and paid for food and clothing during the indenture. And even though indentured servants were promised land at the moment of freedom, they were most often cheated, becoming members of a growing, disaffected, landless class in seventeenth-century Virginia. Whenever possible, planters in Virginia purchased ablebodied workers, in other words, persons (preferably male) capable of performing hard agricultural labor. This preference dramatically skewed the colony’s sex ratio. In the early decades, men outnumbered women by as much as six to one. As one historian, Edmund S. Morgan, observed, “Women were scarcer than corn or liquor in Virginia and fetched a higher price.” Such gender imbalance meant that even if a male servant lived to the end of his indenture—an unlikely prospect—he could not realistically expect to start a family of his own. Moreover, despite apparent legal safeguards, masters could treat dependent workers as they pleased; after all, these people were legally considered property. Servants were sold, traded, even gambled away in games of chance. It does not require much imagination to see that a society that tolerated such an exploitative labor system might later embrace slavery. Most Virginians then did not live long enough to worry about marriage. Death was omnipresent. Indeed, extraordinarily high mortality was a major reason the Chesapeake colonies developed so differently from those of New England. On the eve of the 1618 reforms, Virginia’s population stood at approximately 700. The company sent at least 3,000 more people, but by 1622 only 1,240 were still alive. “It Consequentilie followes,” declared one angry shareholder, “that we had then lost 3,000 persons within those 3 yeares.” The major killers were contagious diseases. Salt in the water supply also took a toll. And on Good Friday, March 22, 1622, the Powhatan Indians slew 347 Europeans in a well-coordinated surprise attack. No one knows for certain what effect such a horrendous mortality rate had on the men and women who survived. At the very least, it must have created a sense of impermanence, a desire to escape Virginia with a little money before sickness or violence ended the adventure. The settlers who drank to excess aboard the tavern ships anchored in the James River described the colony “not as a place of Habitacion but only of a short sojourninge.”

Corruption and Reform
 On both sides of the Atlantic, people wondered who should be blamed. Why had so many colonists died in a land so rich in potential? The burden of responsibility lay in large measure with

The Chesapeake: Dreams of Wealth


Read the Document


Wessell Webling, His Indenture (1622)


 Indentured white servants provided much of the labor necessary for the founding of the early colonies. Here, workers are shown clearing lands for agriculture and splitting logs to make boards for building or sale.

 the Virginia Company. Sandys and his supporters were in too great a hurry to make a profit. Settlers were shipped to America, but neither housing nor food awaited them in Jamestown. Weakened by the long sea voyage, they quickly succumbed to contagious disease. The company’s scandalous mismanagement embarrassed the king, and in 1624, he dissolved the bankrupt enterprise and transformed Virginia into a royal colony. The crown appointed a governor and a council. No provision was made, however, for continuing the local representative assembly, an institution the Stuarts heartily opposed. The House of Burgesses had first convened in 1619. While elections to the Burgesses were hardly democratic, the assembly did provide wealthy planters with a voice in government. Even without the king’s authorization, the representatives gathered annually after 1629, and in 1639, Charles recognized the body’s existence. He had no choice. The colonists who served on the council or in the assembly were strong-willed, ambitious men. They had no intention of surrendering control over local affairs. Since Charles was having political troubles of his own and lived three thousand miles from Jamestown, he usually allowed the Virginians to have their own way. In 1634, the assembly divided the colony into eight counties. In each one, a group of appointed justices of the peace—the wealthy planters of the



 area—convened as a court of law as well as a governing body. The “county court” was the most important institution of local government in Virginia, and long after the American Revolution, it served as a center for social, political, and commercial activities. Changes in government had little impact on the character of daily life in Virginia. The planters continued to grow tobacco, ignoring advice to diversify, and as the Indians were killed, made into tributaries, or pushed north and south, Virginians took up large tracts of land along the colony’s many navigable rivers. The focus of their lives was the isolated plantation, a small cluster of buildings housing the planter’s family and dependent workers. These were modest wooden structures. Not until the eighteenth century did the Chesapeake gentry build the great Georgian mansions that still attract tourists. The dispersed pattern of settlement retarded the development of institutions such as schools and churches. Besides Jamestown there were no population centers, and as late as 1705, Robert Beverley, a leading planter, reported that Virginia did not have a single place “that may reasonably bear the Name of a Town.”

Maryland: A Troubled Refuge
 for Catholics The driving force behind the founding of Maryland was Sir George Calvert, later Lord Baltimore. Calvert, a talented and well-educated man, enjoyed the patronage of James I. He was awarded lucrative positions in the government, the most important being the king’s secretary of state. In 1625, Calvert shocked almost everyone by publicly declaring his Catholicism; in this fiercely anti-Catholic society, persons who openly supported the Church of Rome were immediately stripped of civil office. Although forced to resign as secretary of state, Calvert retained the crown’s favor. Before resigning, Calvert sponsored a settlement on the coast of Newfoundland, but after visiting the place, the proprietor concluded that no English person, whatever his or her religion, would transfer to a place where the “ayre [is] so intolerably cold.” He turned his attention to the Chesapeake, and on June 30, 1632, Charles I granted George Calvert’s son, Cecilius, a charter for a colony to be located north of Virginia. The boundaries of the settlement, named Maryland in honor of Charles’s queen, were so vaguely defined that they generated legal controversies not fully resolved until the mid-eighteenth century when Charles Mason and Jeremiah Dixon surveyed their famous line between Pennsylvania and Maryland.



CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

Read the Document


 George Aslop from, “A Character of the Province of Maryland”

 Cecilius Calvert, the second Lord Baltimore, insisted that Maryland tolerate all Christian religions, including Catholicism, something no other colony was willing to do. The young slave in the background reminds us who did the hard labor in the Chesapeake Colonies.

 Cecilius, the second Lord Baltimore, wanted to create a sanctuary for England’s persecuted Catholics. He also intended to make money. Without Protestant settlers, it seemed unlikely Maryland would prosper, and Cecilius instructed his brother Leonard, the colony’s governor, to do nothing that might frighten off hypersensitive Protestants. The governor was ordered to “cause all Acts of the Roman Catholic Religion to be done as privately as may be and . . . [to] instruct all Roman Catholics to be silent upon all occasions of discourse concerning matters of Religion.” On March 25, 1634, the Ark and Dove, carrying about 150 settlers, landed safely, and within days, the governor purchased from the Yaocomico Indians a village that became St. Mary’s City, the capital of Maryland. The colony’s charter was an odd document, a throwback to an earlier feudal age. It transformed Baltimore into a “palatine lord,” a proprietor with almost royal powers. Settlers swore

 an oath of allegiance not to the king of England but to Lord Baltimore. In England, such practices had long ago passed into obsolescence. As the proprietor, Lord Baltimore owned outright almost 6 million acres; he possessed absolute authority over anyone living in his domain. On paper, at least, everyone in Maryland was assigned a place in an elaborate social hierarchy. Members of a colonial ruling class, persons who purchased 6,000 acres from Baltimore, were called lords of the manor. These landed aristocrats were permitted to establish local courts of law. People holding less acreage enjoyed fewer privileges, particularly in government. Baltimore figured that land sales and rents would adequately finance the entire venture. Baltimore’s feudal system never took root in Chesapeake soil. People simply refused to play the social roles the lord proprietor had assigned. These tensions affected the operation of Maryland’s government. Baltimore assumed that his brother, acting as his deputy in America, and a small appointed council of local aristocrats would pass necessary laws and carry out routine administration. When an elected assembly first convened in 1635, Baltimore allowed the delegates to discuss only those acts he had prepared. The members of the assembly bridled at such restrictions, insisting on exercising traditional parliamentary privileges. Neither side gained a clear victory in the assembly, and for almost twenty-five years, legislative squabbling contributed to the widespread political instability that almost destroyed Maryland. The colony drew both Protestants and Catholics, and the two groups might have lived in harmony had civil war not broken out in England. When Cromwell and the Puritan faction executed Charles, transforming England briefly into a republic, it seemed Baltimore might lose his colony. To head off such an event and to placate Maryland’s restless Protestants, in 1649, the proprietor drafted the famous “Act concerning Religion,” which extended toleration to all individuals who accepted the divinity of Christ. At a time when European rulers regularly persecuted people for their religious beliefs, Baltimore championed liberty of conscience. However laudable the act may have been, it did not heal religious divisions in Maryland, and when local Puritans seized the colony’s government, they promptly repealed the act. For almost two decades, vigilantes roamed the countryside, and during the “Plundering Time” (1644–1646), one armed group temporarily drove Leonard Calvert out of Maryland. In 1655, civil war flared again. In this troubled sanctuary, ordinary planters and their workers cultivated tobacco on plantations dispersed along riverfronts. In 1678, Baltimore complained that he could not find fifty houses in a space of thirty miles. Tobacco affected almost every aspect of local culture. “In Virginia and Maryland,” one Calvert explained, “Tobacco, as our Staple, is our all, and indeed leaves no room for anything Else.” A steady stream of indentured servants supplied the plantations with dependent laborers— until they were replaced by African slaves at the end of the seventeenth century. Europeans sacrificed much by coming to the Chesapeake. For most of the century, their standard of living was primitive when compared with that of people of the same social class who had

Reforming England in America


 remained in England. Two-thirds of the planters, for example, lived in houses of only two rooms and of a type associated with the poorest classes in contemporary English society.

Reforming England in America
 How did differences in religion affect the founding of the New England colonies? The Pilgrims enjoy almost mythic status in American history. These brave refugees crossed the cold Atlantic in search of religious liberty, signed a democratic compact aboard the Mayflower, landed at Plymouth Rock, and gave us our Thanksgiving Day. As with most legends, this one contains only a core of truth. The Pilgrims were not crusaders who set out to change the world. Rather, they were humble English farmers. Their story began in the early 1600s in Scrooby Manor, a small community located approximately 150 miles north of London. Many people living in this area believed the Church of England retained too many traces of its Catholic origin. To support such a corrupt institution was like winking at the devil. Its very rituals compromised God’s true believers, and so, in the early years of the reign of James I, the Scrooby congregation formally left the established state church. Like others who followed this logic, they were called Separatists. Since English statute required citizens to attend Anglican services, the Scrooby Separatists moved to Holland in 1608–1609 rather than compromise. The Netherlands provided the Separatists with a good home— too good. The members of the little church feared they were losing their distinct identity; their children were becoming Dutch. In 1617, therefore, a portion of the original Scrooby congregation vowed to sail to America. Included in this group was William Bradford, a wonderfully literate man who wrote Of Plymouth Plantation, one of the first and certainly most poignant accounts of an early American settlement. Poverty presented the major obstacle to the Pilgrims’ plans. They petitioned for a land patent from the Virginia Company of London. At the same time, they looked for someone willing to underwrite the staggering costs of colonization. The negotiations went well, or so it seemed. After stopping in England to take on supplies and laborers, the Pilgrims set off for America in 1620 aboard the Mayflower, armed with a patent to settle in Virginia and indebted to a group of English investors who were only marginally interested in religious reform. Because of an error in navigation, the Pilgrims landed not in Virginia but in New England. The patent for which they had worked so diligently had no validity in the region. In fact, the crown had granted New England to another company. Without a patent, the colonists possessed no authorization to form a civil government, a serious matter since some sailors who were not Pilgrims threatened mutiny. To preserve the struggling community from anarchy, forty-one men signed an agreement known as the Mayflower Compact to “covenant and combine our selves together into a civil body politick.” Although later praised for its democratic character, the Mayflower Compact could not ward off disease and hunger. During the first months in Plymouth, death claimed approximately



 half of the 102 people who had initially set out from England. Moreover, debts contracted in England severely burdened the new colony. To their credit, the Pilgrims honored their financial obligations, but it took almost twenty years to satisfy the English investors. Without Bradford, whom they elected as governor, the settlers might have allowed adversity to overwhelm them. Through strength of will and self-sacrifice, however, Bradford persuaded frightened men and women that they could survive in America. Bradford had a lot of help. Almost anyone who has heard of the Plymouth Colony knows of Squanto, a Patuxt Indian who welcomed the first Pilgrims in excellent English. In 1614, unscrupulous adventurers had kidnapped Squanto and sold him in Spain as a slave. Somehow, this resourceful man escaped bondage, making his way to London, where a group of merchants who owned land in Newfoundland taught him to speak English. They apparently hoped that he would deliver moving public testimonials about the desirability of moving to the New World. In any case, Squanto returned to the Plymouth area just before the Pilgrims arrived. Squanto joined Massasoit, a local Native American leader, in teaching the Pilgrims much about hunting and agriculture, a debt that Bradford freely acknowledged. Although evidence for the so-called First Thanksgiving is extremely sketchy, it is certain that without Native American support the Europeans would have starved. In time, the Pilgrims replicated the humble little farm communities they had once known in England. They formed Separatist congregations to their liking; the population slowly increased. The settlers experimented with commercial fishing and the fur trade, but the efforts never generated substantial income. Most families relied on mixed husbandry, grain, and livestock. Because Plymouth offered only limited economic prospects, it attracted only a trickle of new settlers. In 1691, the colony was absorbed into its larger and more prosperous neighbor, Massachusetts Bay.

“The Great Migration”
 In the early decades of the seventeenth century, an extraordinary spirit of religious reform burst forth in England, and before it had burned itself out, Puritanism had transformed the face of England and America. Modern historians have difficulty comprehending this powerful spiritual movement. Some consider the Puritans rather neurotic individuals who condemned liquor and sex, dressed in drab clothes, and minded their neighbors’ business. The crude caricature is based on a profound misunderstanding of the actual nature of this broad popular movement. The seventeenth-century Puritans were more like today’s radical political reformers, men and women committed to far-reaching institutional change, than like naive do-gooders or narrow fundamentalists. To their enemies, of course, the Puritans were irritants, always pointing out civil and ecclesiastical imperfections and urging everyone to try to fulfill the commands of Scripture. A great many people, however, shared their vision, and not only did they found several American colonies, but they also sparked the English Civil War, an event that generated bold new thinking about republican government and popular sovereignty.



CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

 The Puritans were products of the Protestant Reformation. They accepted a Calvinist notion that an omnipotent God predestined some people to salvation and damned others throughout eternity (see Chapter 1 ) . But instead of waiting passively for Judgment Day, the Puritans examined them selves for signs of grace, for hints that God had in fact placed them among his “elect.” A member of this select group, they argued, would try to live according to Scripture, to battle sin and eradicate corruption. For the Puritans, the logic of everyday life was clear. If the Church of England contained unscriptural elements—clerical vestments, for example—then they must be eliminated. If the pope in Rome was in league with the Antichrist, then Protestant kings had better not form alliances with Catholic states. If God condemned licentiousness and intoxication, then local officials should punish whores and drunks. There was nothing improper about an occasional beer or passionate physical love within marriage, but when sex and drink became ends in themselves, the Puritans thought England’s ministers and magistrates should

Read the Document


John Winthrop, “A Model of
Christian Charity” (1830)


 Voters in Massachusetts who were called “freemen” reelected John Winthrop governor many times, an indication of his success in translating Puritan values into practical policy.

 speak out. Persons of this temperament were more combative than the Pilgrims had been. They wanted to purify the Church of England from within, and before the 1630s at least, separatism held little appeal for them. From the Puritan perspective, the early Stuarts, James I and Charles I, seemed unconcerned about the spiritual state of the nation. James tolerated corruption within his own court; he condoned gross public extravagance. His foreign policy appeased European Catholic powers. At one time, he even tried to marry his son to a Catholic princess. Neither king showed interest in purifying the Anglican Church. In fact, Charles assisted the rapid advance of William Laud, a bishop who represented everything the Puritans detested. Laud defended church ceremonies that they found obnoxious. He persecuted Puritan ministers, forcing them either to conform to his theology or lose their licenses to preach. As long as Parliament met, Puritan voters in the various boroughs and countries throughout England elected men sympathetic to their point of view. These outspoken representatives criticized royal policies and hounded Laud. Because of their defiance, Charles decided in 1629 to rule England without Parliament and four years later named Laud archbishop of Canterbury. The last doors of reform slammed shut. The corruption remained. John Winthrop, the future governor of Massachusetts Bay, was caught up in these events. Little about his background suggested such an auspicious future. He owned a small manor in Suffolk, one that never produced sufficient income to support his growing family. He dabbled in law. But the core of Winthrop’s life was his faith in God, a faith so intense his contemporaries immediately identified him as a Puritan. The Lord, he concluded, was displeased with England. Time for reform was running out. In May 1629, he wrote to his wife, “I am verily perswaded God will bringe some heavye Affliction upon this lande, and that speedylye.” He was, however, confident that the Lord would “provide a shelter and a hidinge place for us.” Other Puritans, some wealthier and politically better connected than Winthrop, reached similar conclusions about England’s future. They turned their attention to the possibility of establishing a colony in America, and on March 4, 1629, their Massachusetts Bay Company obtained a charter directly from the king. Charles and his advisers apparently thought the Massachusetts Bay Company was a commercial venture no different from the dozens of other joint-stock companies that had recently sprung into existence. Winthrop and his associates knew better. On August 26, 1629, twelve of them met secretly and signed the Cambridge Agreement. They pledged to be “ready in our persons and with such of our severall familyes as are to go with us . . . to embark for the said plantation by the first of March next.” There was one loophole. The charters of most joint-stock companies designated a specific place where business meetings were to be held. For reasons not entirely clear—a timely bribe is a good guess—the charter of the Massachusetts Bay Company did not contain this standard clause. It could hold meetings anywhere the stockholders, called “freemen,” desired, even America, and if they were in America, the king and his archbishop could not easily interfere in their affairs.

Reforming England in America


“A City on a Hill”
 The Winthrop fleet departed England in March 1630. By the end of the first year, almost two thousand people had arrived in Massachusetts Bay, and before the “Great Migration” concluded in the early 1640s, more than sixteen thousand men and women had arrived in the new Puritan colony. A great deal is known about the background of these particular settlers. A large percentage of them originated in an area northeast of London called East Anglia, a region in which Puritan ideas had taken deep root. London, Kent, and the West Country also contributed to the stream of emigrants. In some instances, entire villages were reestablished across the Atlantic. Many Bay Colonists had worked as farmers in England, but a surprisingly large number came from industrial centers, such as Norwich, where cloth was manufactured for the export trade. Whatever their backgrounds, they moved to Massachusetts as nuclear families, fathers, mothers, and their dependent children, a form of migration strikingly different from the one that peopled Virginia and Maryland. Moreover, because the settlers had already formed families in England, the colony’s sex ratio was more balanced than that found in the Chesapeake colonies. Finally, and perhaps more significantly, once they had arrived in Massachusetts, these men and women survived. Indeed, their life expectancy compares favorably to that of modern Americans. Many factors help explain this phenomenon—clean drinking water and a healthy climate, for example. While the Puritans could not have planned to live longer than did colonists in other parts of the New World, this remarkable accident reduced the emotional shock of long-distance migration. The first settlers possessed another source of strength and stability. They were bound together by a common sense of purpose. God, they insisted, had formed a special covenant with the people of Massachusetts Bay. On his part, the Lord expected them to live according to Scripture, to reform the church, in other words, to create an Old Testament “city on a hill” that would stand as a beacon of righteousness for the rest of the Christian world. If they fulfilled their side of the bargain, the settlers could anticipate peace and prosperity. No one, not even the lowliest servant, was excused from this divine covenant, for as Winthrop stated, “Wee must be knitt together in this worke as one man.” Even as the first ships were leaving England, John Cotton, a popular Puritan minister, urged the emigrants to go forth “with a publicke spirit, looking not on your owne things only, but also on the things of others.” Many people throughout the ages have espoused such communal rhetoric, but these particular men and women went about the business of forming a new colony as if they truly intended to transform a religious vision into social reality. The Bay Colonists gradually came to accept a highly innovative form of church government known as Congregationalism. Under the system, each village church was independent of outside interference. The American Puritans, of course, wanted nothing of bishops. The people (the “saints”) were the church, and as a body, they pledged to uphold God’s law. In the Salem Church, for example, the members covenanted “with the Lord and with one another and do bind ourselves in the presence of God to walk together in all his ways.”



 Simply because a person happened to live in a certain community did not mean he or she automatically belonged to the local church. Th e churches of Massachusetts were voluntary institutions, and in order to join one a man or woman had to provide testimony—a confession of faith—before neighbors who had already been admitted as full members. It was a demanding process. Whatever the personal strains, however, most men and women in early Massachusetts aspired to full membership, which entitled them to the sacraments, and gave some of them responsibility for choosing ministers, disciplining backsliders, and determining difficult questions of theology. Although women and blacks could not vote for ministers, they did become members of the Congregational churches. Over the course of the seventeenth century, women made up an increasingly large share of the membership. Some aspects of community religiosity in early Massachusetts may, of course, strike modern Americans as morbid. Ministers expected people convicted of capital crimes to offer a full public confession of their sins just before their own execution. Such rituals reinforced everyday moral values by reminding ordinary men and women—those who listened to the confession—of the fatal consequences awaiting those who ignored the teachings of Scripture. In creating a civil government, the Bay Colonists faced a particularly difficult challenge. Their charter allowed the investors in a joint-stock company to set up a business organization. When the settlers arrived in America, however, company leaders— men like Winthrop—moved quickly to transform the commercial structure into a colonial government. An early step in this direction took place on May 18, 1631, when the category of “freeman” was extended to all adult males who had become members of a Congregational church. This decision greatly expanded the franchise of Massachusetts Bay, and historians estimate that during the 1630s, at least 40 percent of the colony’s adult males could vote in elections. While this percentage may seem low by modern or even Jacksonian standards, it was higher than anything the emigrants would have known in England. The freemen voted annually for a governor, a group of magistrates called the Court of Assistants, and after 1634, deputies who represented the interests of the individual towns. Even military officers were elected every year in Massachusetts Bay. Two popular misconceptions about this government should be dispelled. It was neither a democracy nor a theocracy. The magistrates elected in Massachusetts did not believe they represented the voters, much less the whole populace. They ruled in the name of the electorate, but their responsibility as rulers was to God. In 1638, Winthrop warned against overly democratic forms, since “the best part [of the people] is always the least, and of that best part the wiser is always the lesser.” And second, the Congregational ministers possessed no formal political authority in Massachusetts Bay. They could not even hold civil office, and it was not unusual for the voters to ignore the recommendations of a respected minister such as John Cotton. In New England, the town became the center of public life. In other regions of British America where the county was the focus of local government, people did not experience the same density of social and institutional interaction. In Massachusetts,

 Complete the Assignment The Children Who Refused to Come Home: Captivity and Conversion on myhistorylab

Feature
Essay


The Children Who Refused
 to Come Home Captivity and Conversion

 Portrait of Esther Wheelwright as an Ursuline nun.

T


 he spread of terrorism throughout the modern world and reports of journalists and civilian workers captured in war zones have forced many Americans to contemplate a deeply unsettling question: How would they behave if they were kidnapped by members of a group hostile to the fundamental values of the United States? Such concerns are not new. During the colonial period, New Englanders who settled along the frontier with French Canada knew that at any moment they might be carried away to Quebec or Montreal as captives and under fearful conditions might discover the fragility of their own ethnic and religious identities. Between 1675 and 1763 the French and British empires waged almost constant war. Often the conflicts turned on



 dynastic rivalries in Europe, but whatever the causes, the fighting extended to North America, where in an effort to contain the expansion of English settlement, the French and their Indian allies raided exposed communities from the coast of Maine to western Massachusetts. During these years, approximately 1,641 English colonists were taken captive—nearly half of them children—and many other people died in the violent clashes. On the long trek back to Canada, the French and Indians killed those prisoners who resisted or who were too weak to keep up the pace. The Reverend Cotton Mather, New England’s most influential late-seventeenth-century minister, invited his parishioners to imagine the terrifying experience of capture: “[The] Captives . . . are every minute looking when they shall be roasted alive, to

 make a sport and a feast, for the most execrable cannibals . . . Captives, that must see their nearest relations butchered before their eyes, and yet be afraid of letting those eyes drop a tear.” Although the French aimed to advance their imperial designs through attacks on English settlements, their Indian allies often entered the frontier wars for different reasons. The Abenaki, for example, harbored grievances against the English colonists from earlier conflicts and hoped with the help of the French to reap vengeance on them. Other Indian groups regarded the English captives as a source of revenue. After all, someone from Massachusetts was sure to offer a ransom for an unfortunate relative, and as one might predict in such a market, the price of liberation rose substantially over time. The Mohawk

 Indians, however, viewed the captives as replacements for warriors killed in battle, and whenever possible, they worked to incorporate the New Englanders into their own culture. They knew from experience that children, especially young girls, offered the best prospects for successful adoption. For the French and many of their Indian allies who had converted to Catholicism, religion served to justify frontier violence. French officials championed the Catholic faith, and they regarded New Englanders, not only as representatives of the British Empire, but also as Protestant heretics. The English gave as good as they got. They accepted as absolute truth that Catholicism was an utterly corrupt religion and that priests, especially Jesuits, could not be trusted in spiritual matters. French religious and political leaders looked upon New England captives as possible converts to Catholicism, for in this ongoing imperial controversy, news that an English Protestant had given up his or her faith for Rome represented a major symbolic victory. As historian James Axtell explained, if the English could not preserve their religious identities as captives, then “their pretensions to the status as God’s ‘chosen people’ . . . would be cast in grave doubt.” The odds of converting young New Englanders to Catholicism in these circumstances must have appeared extraordinarily small. The captives taken in war had come from highly religious communities, where they had received regular instruction in the basic tenets of Reformed Protestantism. As children, Puritans learned to equate the Pope with Satan. Their forefathers had traveled to the New World to cleanse the Church of England from practices associated with Catholicism. And yet, amazingly, once they arrived in Canada, a significant number of prisoners—perhaps as much as fifty percent—accepted the Catholic faith, married French or Indian spouses, and settled comfortably into the routines of life in Canada. One such convert was Esther Wheelwright. Abenaki Indians captured

 her in Wells, Maine, in 1703 when she was only seven years old, and adopted her. She was later taken in by nuns who taught her French. She became a keen student of Catholicism. Over time, the sincerity of her new faith won her many admirers, and eventually Esther—renamed Esther Marie Joseph de l’Enfant Jesus—became an Ursuline nun. Some years later, she was appointed Superior of the entire Ursuline order in Canada. When New Englanders attempted to negotiate her release, they discovered that “she does not wish to return” because of the “change of her religion.” Esther’s mother and father reluctantly accepted their daughter’s decision. They even gave money to her convent, and in recognition of their generosity and forgiveness, she sent a portrait of herself as a nun to her bewildered Protestant family. In the long contest for religious and cultural superiority, Eunice Williams posed an even more difficult challenge for New Englanders. After all, she was the daughter of a leading Congregational minister; no one doubted the quality of her religious instruction. Eunice’s ordeal began on February 29, 1704, when a large force of French and Indians overran Deerfield, an agricultural community in western Massachusetts. Within a short time the raiders killed many inhabitants, including several members of her family. Her mother died during the long march to Canada. Eventually, the Reverend Williams negotiated his freedom as well as that of several surviving children. Eunice refused to join them. She had fallen in love with an Indian, and although friends and relatives begged her to reject Catholicism and life among the Kahnawake Mohawks, she politely, but firmly, rejected their pleas. Over the next several decades, Eunice and her Indian husband visited New England. On one occasion in 1741, her cousin the Reverend Solomon Williams pointed out in a sermon that Eunice had accepted the “Thickness of popish Darkness & Superstition.” Lamenting her “pitiful and sorrowful Condition,” he urged her to reaffirm the faith of her

 father. Unhappily for Solomon, Eunice had forgotten all that she once knew of the English language, and so the force of his shrill condemnation was lost on her. No society easily accepts rejection. New Englanders struggled to comprehend why so many of their children would not come home, and they tried as best they could to explain to themselves why Eunice and the other captives refused to be redeemed. They assured each other that crafty priests had bribed—or even coerced—the children. A few ministers such as Cotton Mather and Eunice’s father suggested that God had punished the Protestant communities for their sinful behavior. Whatever contemporaries may have thought of these accounts, modern historians have demonstrated that Catholic priests seldom employed force or promises of worldly goods in winning converts. Some captives may have felt gratitude to the French and Indians who had spared their lives. But undoubtedly, love, marriage, and a growing sense of security in a new society helped sever ties with a New England culture that slowly faded from memory. The Reverend John Williams’s own narrative of the Deerfield captives entitled The Redeemed Captive Returning to Zion (1707) addressed the crisis. It became a best-seller in a colony eager to hear the story of those redeemed from captivity, those returned to the fold. At the end of the day, however, the problem of abandoning one’s nation and one’s faith continued to haunt ordinary men and women who fervently identified with England and Protestantism. By turning their backs on European civilization, English culture, and the Protestant religion, these captives challenged foundational values even more powerfully than did the French and Indians.

QUESTIONS FOR DISCUSSION 1.
Why did so many New England captives refuse to return home? 2. Why did the French and Indians view English children, especially young girls, as the most likely converts to their religion and way of life? 




CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

 groups of men and women voluntarily covenanted together to observe common goals. The community constructed a meetinghouse where religious services and town meetings were held. This powerful sense of shared purpose—something that later Americans have greatly admired—should not obscure the fact that the founders of New England towns also had a keen eye for personal profit. Seventeenth-century records reveal that speculators often made a good deal of money from selling “shares” in village lands. But acquisitiveness never got out of control, and recent studies have shown that entrepreneurial practices rarely disturbed the peace of the Puritan communities. Inhabitants generally received land sufficient to build a house to support a family. Although villagers escaped the kind of feudal dues collected in other parts of America, they were expected to contribute to the minister’s salary, pay local and colony taxes, and serve in the militia.

Limits of Religious Dissent
 The European settlers of Massachusetts Bay managed to live in peace—at least with each other. This was a remarkable achievement considering the chronic instability that plagued other colonies at this time. The Bay Colonists disagreed over many issues, sometimes vociferously; whole towns disputed with neighboring villages over common boundaries. But the people inevitably relied on the civil courts to mediate differences. They believed in a rule of law, and in 1648 the colonial legislature, called the General Court, drew up the Lawes and Liberties, the first alphabetized code of law printed in English. This is a document of fundamental importance in American constitutional history. In clear prose, it explained to ordinary colonists their rights and responsibilities as citizens of the commonwealth. The code engendered public trust in government and discouraged magistrates from the arbitrary exercise of authority. The Puritans never supported the concept of religious toleration. They transferred to the New World to preserve their own freedom of worship; about religious freedom of those deemed heretics, they expressed little concern. The most serious challenges to Puritan orthodoxy in Massachusetts Bay came from two brilliantly charismatic individuals. The first, Roger Williams, arrived in 1631 and immediately attracted a body of loyal followers. Indeed, everyone seemed to have liked Williams as a person. Williams’s religious ideas, however, created controversy. He preached extreme separatism. The Bay Colonists, he exclaimed, were impure in the sight of the Lord so long as they remained even nominal members of the Church of England. Moreover, he questioned the validity of the colony’s charter, since the king had not first purchased the land from the Indians, a view that threatened the integrity of the entire colonial experiment. Williams also insisted that the civil rulers of Massachusetts had no business punishing settlers for their religious beliefs. It was God’s responsibility, not men’s, to monitor people’s consciences. The Bay magistrates were prepared neither to tolerate heresy nor to accede to Williams’s other demands, and in 1636, after attempts to reach a compromise had failed, they banished him from the colony. Williams worked out the logic of his ideas in Providence, a village he founded in what would become Rhode Island.

 The magistrates of Massachusetts Bay rightly concluded that the second individual, Anne Hutchinson, posed an even graver threat to the peace of the commonwealth. This extremely intelligent woman, her husband William, and her children followed John Cotton to the New World in 1634. Even contemporaries found her religious ideas, usually termed Antinomianism , somewhat confusing. Whatever her thoughts, Hutchinson shared them with other Bostonians, many of them women. Her outspoken views scandalized orthodox leaders of church and state. She suggested that all but two ministers in the colony had lost touch with the “Holy Spirit” and were preaching a doctrine in the Congregational churches that was little better than that of Archbishop Laud. When authorities demanded she explain her unusual opinions, she suggested that she experienced divine inspiration independently of either the Bible or the clergy. In other words, Hutchinson’s teachings could not be tested by Scripture, a position that seemed dangerously subjective. Indeed, Hutchinson’s theology called the very foundation of Massachusetts Bay into question. Without clear, external standards, one person’s truth was as valid as anyone else’s, and from Winthrop’s perspective, Hutchinson’s teachings invited civil and religious anarchy. But her challenge to authority was not simply theological. As a woman, her aggressive speech sparked a deeply misogynistic response from the colony’s male leaders. When this woman described Congregational ministers— some of them the leading divines of Boston—as unconverted men, the General Court intervened. For two very tense days in 1637, the ministers and magistrates of Massachusetts Bay crossexamined Hutchinson; in this intense theological debate, she more than held her own. She knew as much about the Bible as did her inquisitors. Hutchinson defied the ministers and magistrates to demonstrate exactly where she had gone wrong. Just when it appeared Hutchinson had outmaneuvered—indeed, thoroughly embarrassed—her opponents, she let down her guard, declaring forcefully that what she knew of God came “by an immediate revelation. . . . By the voice of his own spirit to my soul.” Here was what her accusers had suspected all along but could not prove. She had confessed in open court that the Spirit can live without the Moral Law. This antinomian statement fulfilled the worst fears of the Bay rulers, and they were relieved to exile Hutchinson and her followers to Rhode Island.

Mobility and Division
 Massachusetts Bay spawned four new colonies, three of which survived to the American Revolution. New Hampshire became a separate colony in 1677. Its population grew very slowly, and for much of the colonial period, New Hampshire remained economically dependent on Massachusetts, its commercial neighbor to the south. Far more people were drawn to the fertile lands of the Connecticut River Valley. In 1636, settlers founded the villages of Hartford, Windsor, and Wethersfield. No one forced these men and women to leave Massachusetts, and in their new surroundings, they created a society that looked much like the one they had

Reforming England in America


Connecti
 cut R.

 MAINE (part of Mass.)

NEW HAMPSHIRE
(part of Mass.) 
Hudson R.


Portsmouth


MASSACHUSETTS BAY

Salem
Boston


Hartford


NEW HAVEN

Providence


 PLYMOUTH

Wethersfield


CONNECTICUT
New Haven 
NEW HAVEN

CONN. CONN. NEW N E T H E R L AND

Narragansett Bay


RHODE ISLAND

ATLANTIC OCEAN





 Not surprisingly, these men and women appreciated the need for toleration. No one was persecuted in Rhode Island for his or her religious beliefs. One might have thought the separate Rhode Island communities would cooperate for the common good. They did not. Villagers fought over land and schemed with outside speculators to divide the tiny colony into even smaller pieces. In 1644, Parliament issued a patent for the “Providence Plantations,” and in 1663, the Rhode Islanders obtained a royal charter. These successes did not calm political turmoil. For most of the seventeenth century, colonywide government existed in name only. Despite their constant bickering, however, the settlers of Rhode Island built up a profitable commerce in agricultural goods.

Allies and Enemies


Plymouth
Windsor




 100 miles 100 kilometers

NEW ENGLAND COLONIES, 1650

 The early settlers quickly carved up New England. New Haven briefly flourished as a separate colony before being taken over by Connecticut in 1662. Long Island later became part of New York; Plymouth was absorbed into Massachusetts, and in 1677 New Hampshire became a separate colony.

 known in the Bay Colony. Through his writings, Thomas Hooker, Connecticut’s most prominent minister, helped all New Englanders define Congregational church polity. Puritans on both sides of the Atlantic read Hooker’s beautifully crafted works. In 1639, representatives from the Connecticut towns passed the Fundamental Orders, a blueprint for civil government, and in 1662, Charles II awarded the colony a charter of its own. In 1638, another group, led by Theophilus Eaton and the Reverend John Davenport, settled New Haven and several adjoining towns along Long Island Sound. These emigrants, many of whom had come from London, lived briefly in Massachusetts Bay but then insisted on forming a Puritan commonwealth of their own, one that established a closer relationship between church and state than the Bay Colonists had allowed. The New Haven colony never prospered, and in 1662, it was absorbed into Connecticut. Rhode Island experienced a wholly different history. From the beginning, it drew people of a highly independent turn of mind, and according to one Dutch visitor, Rhode Island was “the receptacle of all sorts of riff-raff people. . . . All the cranks of New-England retire thither.” This description, of course, was an exaggeration. Roger Williams founded Providence in 1636; two years later, Anne Hutchinson took her followers to Portsmouth. Other groups settled around Narragansett Bay.

 Puritan expansion in New England did not occur unopposed. During the 1620s, the Pequots, a numerous tribe whose home territory centered on the Thames and Mystic rivers, dominated the trade of southern New England. The Pequots collected furs from other Indian peoples in the region, sold them to the Dutch, and then resold the European goods they obtained to their Indian clients. This middleman status proved highly profitable for the Pequots, giving them first access to the metal weapons, firearms, and other tools sold by the Dutch. Their commercial and military power allowed the Pequots to impose their political control over much of the region and to force their trading partners to pay them tribute. The founding of the English colonies offered potential new trading partners for the Indians of New England. The Pilgrims and Puritans may have come to New England for religious reasons, but this did not stop them from participating in the region’s lucrative fur trade. The Pequots resented this intrusion. They saw the English traders as a threat to their regional power. The English, for their part, saw the Dutch and their Pequot trading partners as a challenge to English control of New England. In 1636, an English trader named John Oldham was killed by unknown Indians. The English eventually came to blame the Pequots, resulting in war. The English allied themselves with the Mohegan Indians, a tribe that had formerly been tributaries to the Pequots, and the Narragansetts, who had recently had some of their land seized by the Pequots. The Pequot nation was already in decline when the war started. The Pequots had been ravaged by epidemic disease in 1619 and 1633. From a pre-contact population of 13,000, only 3,000 Pequots remained. The Pequot War, as it came to be known, all but destroyed the tribe. The English and their allies quickly routed the Pequots. The English waged an especially vicious campaign. For example, in 1637, English soldiers surrounded a Pequot village on the Mystic River that contained mostly women, children, and old men. The English soldiers set the village on fi re and then shot down any Pequots who tried to escape. After the war, the English took most of the surviving Pequots as slaves, giving some to their allies and selling the remainder to the English plantations in the West Indies. The English won the war, but their savage tactics alienated their Indian allies.



CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

Diversity in the Middle Colonies
 How did ethnic diversity shape the development of the Middle Colonies? New York, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and Delaware were settled for quite different reasons. William Penn, for example, envisioned a Quaker sanctuary; the Duke of York worried chiefly about his own income. Despite the founders’ intentions, however, some common characteristics emerged. Each colony developed a strikingly heterogeneous population, men and women of different ethnic and religious backgrounds. This cultural diversity became a major influence on the economic, political, and ecclesiastical institutions of the Middle Colonies. The raucous, partisan public life of the Middle Colonies foreshadowed later American society.

Anglo-Dutch Rivalry on the Hudson
 By the early decades of the seventeenth century, the Dutch had established themselves as Europe’s most aggressive traders. Holland—a small, loosely federated nation—possessed the world’s largest merchant fleet. Its ships vied for the commerce of Asia, Africa, and America. Dutch rivalry with Spain, a fading though still formidable power, was in large measure responsible for the settlement of New Netherland. While searching for the

CE FRAN

Abenaki


Lake
Champlain


NEW YORK

Lake Ontario


Mahican


 ware R. ela

Hudson R.


 MASS.

.
 na R ehan Susqu D

 PENNSYLVANIA

N.H.


Albany


Iroquois Confederation


 ie Er ke a L

Connecticut R


.


W
 NE

Delaware
(Lenni-Lenape)


 CONN.

New York


EAST JERSEY

Germantown
Philadelphia
Susquehannock


MD. VA.



WEST JERSEY

ATLANTIC OCEAN

THREE COUNTIES OF DELAWARE

 100 miles 100 kilometers

MIDDLE COLONIES, 1685

Until the Revolution, the Iroquois
 blocked European expansion into Western New York. The Jerseys and Pennsylvania initially attracted English and Irish Quakers, who were soon joined by thousands of Protestant Irish and Germans.

 elusive Northwest Passage in 1609, Henry Hudson, an English explorer employed by a Dutch company, sailed up the river that now bears his name. Further voyages led to the establishment of trading posts in New Netherland and on the Connecticut River, although permanent settlement at New Netherland did not occur until 1624. The area also seemed an excellent base from which to attack Spain’s colonies in the New World. The directors of the Dutch West India Company sponsored two small outposts, Fort Orange (Albany) located well up the Hudson River and New Amsterdam (New York City) on Manhattan Island. The first Dutch settlers were not actually colonists. Rather, they were salaried employees, and their superiors in Holland expected them to spend most of their time gathering animal furs. They did not receive land for their troubles. Needless to say, this arrangement attracted relatively few Dutch immigrants. The colony’s population may have been small, only 270 in 1628, but it contained an extraordinary ethnic mix. One visitor to New Amsterdam in 1644 maintained he had heard “eighteen different languages” spoken in the city. Even if this report was exaggerated, there is no doubt the Dutch colony drew English, Finns, Germans, and Swedes. By the 1640s, a sizable community of free blacks (probably former slaves who had gained their freedom through self-purchase) had developed in New Amsterdam, adding African tongues to the cacophony of languages. The colony’s culture was further fragmented by New England Puritans who left Massachusetts and Connecticut to stake out farms on eastern Long Island. New Netherland lacked capable leadership. The company sent a number of director-generals to oversee judicial and political affairs. Without exception, these men were temperamentally unsuited to govern an American colony. They adopted autocratic procedures, lined their own pockets, and, in one case, blundered into a war that needlessly killed scores of Indians and settlers. The company made no provision for an elected assembly. As much as they were able, the scattered inhabitants living along the Hudson River ignored company directives. They felt no loyalty to the trading company that had treated them so shabbily. Long Island Puritans complained bitterly about the absence of representative institutions. The Dutch system has aptly been described as “unstable pluralism.” In August 1664, the Dutch lost their tenuous hold on New Netherland. The English crown, eager to score an easy victory over a commercial rival, dispatched a fleet of warships to New Amsterdam. The commander of this force, Colonel Richard Nicolls, ordered the colonists to surrender. The last director-general, a colorful character named Peter Stuyvesant (1647–1664), rushed wildly about the city urging the settlers to resist the English. But no one obeyed. Even the Dutch remained deaf to Stuyvesant’s appeals. They accepted the Articles of Capitulation, a generous agreement that allowed Dutch nationals to remain in the province and to retain their property. Charles II had already granted his brother, James, the Duke of York, a charter for the newly captured territory and much else besides. The duke became absolute proprietor over Maine, Martha’s Vineyard, Nantucket, Long Island, and the rest of New York all the way to Delaware Bay. The king perhaps

Diversity in the Middle Colonies


Read the Document


Father Isaac Jogues, Description of New York, 1640




 it had been under the Dutch West India Company: a loose collection of independent communities ruled by an ineffectual central government.

Confusion in New Jersey
 Only three months after receiving a charter for New York, the Duke of York made a terrible mistake—something this stubborn, humorless man was prone to do. As a gift to two courtiers who had served Charles during the English Civil War, the duke awarded the land lying between the Hudson and Delaware rivers to John, Lord Berkeley, and Sir George Carteret. This colony was named New Jersey in honor of Carteret’s birthplace, the Isle of Jersey in the English Channel. When Nicolls heard what the duke had done, he exploded. In his estimation, this fertile region contained the “most improveable” land in all New York, and to give it away so casually seemed the height of folly. The duke’s impulsive act bred confusion. Soon it was not clear who owned what in New Jersey. Before Nicolls had learned of James’s decision, the governor had allowed migrants from New England to take up farms west of the Map of New York City presented to James, Duke of York (the future James II), shortly after the English Hudson River. He promised the settlers an captured New Amsterdam from the Dutch in 1664. opportunity to establish an elected assembly, a headright system, and liberty of wanted to encircle New England’s potentially disloyal Puritan conscience. In exchange for these privileges, Nicolls asked only that population, but whatever his aims may have been, he created a they pay a small annual quitrent to the duke. The new proprietors, bureaucratic nightmare. Berkeley and Carteret, recruited colonists on similar terms. They assumed, of course, that they would receive the rent money. During the English Civil War, the duke had acquired a thorThe result was chaos. Some colonists insisted that Nicolls had ough aversion to representative government. After all, Parliament authorized their assembly. Others, equally insistent, claimed that had executed the duke’s father, Charles I, and raised up Oliver Berkeley and Carteret had done so. Both sides were wrong. Neither Cromwell. The new proprietor had no intention of letting such a the proprietors nor Nicolls possessed any legal right whatsoever participatory system take root in New York. “I cannot but suspect,” to set up a colonial government. James could transfer land to the duke announced, that an assembly “would be of dangerous favorite courtiers, but no matter how many times the land changed consequence.” The Long Islanders felt betrayed. In part to appease hands, the government remained his personal responsibility. these outspoken critics, Governor Nicolls—one of the few compeKnowledge of the law failed to quiet the controversy. Through it all, tent administrators to serve in the Middle Colonies—drew up in the duke showed not the slightest interest in the peace and welfare March 1665 a legal code known as the Duke’s Laws. It guaranteed of the people of New Jersey. religious toleration and created local governments. Berkeley grew tired of the venture. It generated headaches There was no provision, however, for an elected assembly or, rather than income, and in 1674, he sold his proprietary rights for that matter, for democratic town meetings. The legal code disapto a group of surprisingly quarrelsome Quakers. The sale necespointed the Puritan migrants on Long Island, and when the duke’s sitated the division of the colony into two separate governments officers attempted to collect taxes, these people protested that they known as East and West Jersey. Neither half prospered. Carteret were “inslav’d under an Arbitrary Power.” and his heirs tried unsuccessfully to turn a profit in East Jersey. The Dutch kept silent. For several decades they remained In 1677, the Quaker proprietors of West Jersey issued a remarka large unassimilated ethnic group. They continued to speak able democratic plan of government, the Laws, Concessions, and their own language, worship in their own churches (Dutch Agreements. But they fought among themselves with such intenReformed Calvinist), and eye their English neighbors with sity that not even William Penn could bring tranquility to their suspicion. In fact, the colony seemed little different from what



CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

 affairs. Penn wisely turned his attention to the unclaimed territory across the Delaware River. The West Jersey proprietors went bankrupt, and in 1702, the crown reunited the two Jerseys into a single royal colony. In 1700, the population of New Jersey stood at approximately fourteen thousand. Largely because it lacked a good deepwater harbor, the colony never developed a commercial center to rival New York City or Philadelphia. Its residents lived on scattered, often isolated farms; villages of more than a few hundred people were rare. Visitors commented on the diversity of the settlers. There were colonists from almost every European nation. Congregationalists, Presbyterians, Quakers, Baptists, Anabaptists, and Anglicans somehow managed to live together peacefully in New Jersey.

Read the Document


William Penn, “Model for


Government” (1681)


Quakers in America
 How did the Quaker religion influence the development of Pennsylvania? The founding of Pennsylvania cannot be separated from the history of the Quaker movement. Believers in an extreme form of antinomianism, the Quakers saw no need for a learned ministry, since one person’s interpretation of Scripture was as valid as anyone else’s. This radical religious sect, a product of the social upheaval in England during the Civil War, gained its name from the derogatory term that English authorities sometimes used to describe those who “tremble at the word of the Lord.” The name persisted even though the Quakers preferred being called Professors of the Light or, more commonly, Friends.

Quaker Beliefs and Practice
 By the time the Stuarts regained the throne in 1660, the Quakers had developed strong support throughout England. One person responsible for their remarkable success was George Fox (1624– 1691), a poor shoemaker whose own spiritual anxieties sparked a powerful new religious message that pushed beyond traditional reformed Protestantism. According to Fox, he experienced despair “so that I had nothing outwardly to help me . . . [but] then, I heard a voice which said, ‘There is one, even Christ Jesus, that can speak to thy condition.’ ” Throughout his life, Fox and his growing number of followers gave testimony to the working of the Holy Spirit. Indeed, they informed ordinary men and women that if only they would look, they too would discover they possessed an “Inner Light.” This was a wonderfully liberating invitation, especially for persons of lower-class origin. With the Lord’s personal assistance, they could attain greater spiritual perfection on earth. Gone was the stigma of original sin; discarded was the notion of eternal predestination. Everyone could be saved. Quakers practiced humility in their daily lives. They wore simple clothes and employed old-fashioned forms of address that set them apart from their neighbors. Friends refused to honor worldly position and accomplishment or to swear oaths in courts of law. They were also pacifists. According to Fox, all persons were

 William Penn (1644—1718) received a charter for Pennsylvania from King Charles II in 1681. Penn intended his colony to serve as a religious haven for both his fellow Quakers—who faced persecution both from the Church of England and from the Puritans in New England—and for members of other persecuted Protestant sects.

 equal in the sight of the Lord, a belief that generally annoyed people of rank and achievement. Moreover, the Quakers never kept their thoughts to themselves. They preached conversion constantly, spreading the “Truth” throughout England, Ireland, and America. The Friends played important roles in the early history of New Jersey, Rhode Island, and North Carolina, as well as Pennsylvania. In some places, the “publishers of Truth” wore out their welcome. English authorities harassed the Quakers. Thousands, including Fox himself, were jailed, and in Massachusetts Bay between 1659 and 1661, Puritan magistrates ordered several Friends put to death. Such measures proved counterproductive, for persecution only inspired the martyred Quakers to redouble their efforts.

 Penn’s “Holy Experiment” William Penn lived according to the Inner Light, a commitment that led eventually to the founding of Pennsylvania. Penn possessed a curiously complex personality. He was an athletic

Quakers in America


 person who threw himself into intellectual pursuits. He was a bold visionary capable of making pragmatic decisions. He came from an aristocratic family and yet spent his entire adult life involved with a religious movement associated with the lower class. Precisely when Penn’s thoughts turned to America is not known. He was briefly involved with the West Jersey proprietorship. This venture may have suggested the possibility of an even larger enterprise. In any case, Penn negotiated in 1681 one of the more impressive land deals in the history of American real estate. Charles II awarded Penn a charter, making him the sole proprietor of a vast area called Pennsylvania (literally, “Penn’s woods”). The name embarrassed the modest Penn, but he knew better than to look the royal gift horse in the mouth. Why the king bestowed such generosity on a leading Quaker remains a mystery. Perhaps Charles wanted to repay an old debt to Penn’s father. The monarch may have regarded the colony as a means of ridding England of its troublesome Quaker population, or, quite simply, he may have liked Penn. In 1682, the new proprietor purchased from the Duke of York the so-called Three Lower Counties that eventually became Delaware. This astute move guaranteed that Pennsylvania would have access to the Atlantic and determined even before Philadelphia had been established that it would become a commercial center. In designing his government, Penn drew heavily on the writings of James Harrington (1611–1677). This English political philosopher argued that no government could ever be stable unless it refl ected the actual distribution of landed property within society. Both the rich and poor had to have a voice in political affairs; neither should be able to overrule the legitimate interests of the other class. The Frame of Government envisioned a governor appointed by the proprietor, a 72-member Provincial Council responsible for initiating legislation, and a 200-person Assembly that could accept or reject the bills presented to it. Penn apparently thought the Council would be filled by the colony’s richest landholders, or in the words of the Frame, “persons of most note for their wisdom, virtue and ability.” The governor and Council were charged with the routine administration of justice. Smaller landowners spoke through the Assembly. It was a clumsy structure, and in America the entire edifice crumbled under its own weight.

Settling Pennsylvania
 Penn promoted his colony aggressively throughout England, Ireland, and Germany. He had no choice. His only source of revenue was the sale of land and the collection of quitrents. Penn commissioned pamphlets in several languages extolling the quality of Pennsylvania’s rich farmland. The response was overwhelming. People poured into Philadelphia and the surrounding area. In 1685 alone, eight thousand immigrants arrived. Most of the settlers were Irish, Welsh, and English Quakers, and they generally moved to America as families. But Penn opened the door to men and women of all nations. He asserted that the people of Pennsylvania “are a collection of divers nations in Europe, as French, Dutch, Germans, Swedes, Danes, Finns, Scotch, Irish, and English.” The settlers were by no means all Quakers. The founder of Germantown, Francis Daniel Pastorius, called the vessel that



Read the Document


Letter by William Penn to the
Committee of the Free Society of Traders (1683)


 William Penn’s plan for Philadelphia shows the city laid out where the Schuylkill and Delaware rivers parallel each other. Four of the five public squares were intended to be parks while the fifth (at the center) was designated for public buildings. Today, it is the site of Philadelphia’s city hall.

 brought him to the New World a “Noah’s Ark” of religions, and within his own household, there were servants who subscribed “to the Roman [Catholic], to the Lutheran, to the Calvinistic, to the Anabaptist, and to the Anglican church, and only one Quaker.” Ethnic and religious diversity were crucial in the development of Pennsylvania’s public institutions, and its politics took on a quarrelsome quality absent in more homogeneous colonies such as Virginia and Massachusetts. Penn himself emigrated to America in 1682. His stay, however, was unexpectedly short and unhappy. The Council and Assembly—reduced now to more manageable size—fought over the right to initiate legislation. Wealthy Quaker merchants, most of them residents of Philadelphia, dominated the Council. By contrast, the Assembly included men from rural settlements and the Three Lower Counties who showed no concern for the Holy Experiment. Penn did not see his colony again until 1699. During his absence, much had changed. The settlement had prospered. Its agricultural products, especially its excellent wheat, were in demand throughout the Atlantic world. Despite this economic success, however, the population remained deeply divided. Even the Quakers had briefly split into hostile factions. Penn’s handpicked governors had failed to win general support for the proprietor’s policies, and one of them exclaimed in anger that each Quaker “prays for his neighbor on First Days and then preys on him the other six.” As the seventeenth century closed, few colonists still shared the founder’s desire to create a godly, paternalistic society. In 1701, legal challenges in England again forced Penn to depart for the mother country. Just before he sailed, Penn signed the Charter of Liberties, a new frame of government



CHAPT ER 2

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

 that established a unicameral or one-house legislature (the only one in colonial America) and gave the representatives the right to initiate bills. Penn also allowed the Assembly to conduct its business without proprietary interference. The charter provided for the political separation of the Three Lower Counties (Delaware) from Pennsylvania, something people living in the area had demanded for years. This hastily drafted document served as Pennsylvania’s constitution until the American Revolution. His experience in America must have depressed Penn, now both old and sick. In England, Penn was imprisoned for debts incurred by dishonest colonial agents, and in 1718, Pennsylvania’s founder died a broken man.

Planting the Carolinas
 How did the Barbadian background of the early settlers shape the economic development of the Carolinas? In some ways, Carolina society looked much like the one that had developed in Virginia and Maryland. In both areas, white planters forced African slaves to produce staple crops for a world market. But such superficial similarities masked substantial regional differences. In fact, “the South”—certainly the fabled solid South of the early nineteenth century—did not exist during the colonial period. The Carolinas, joined much later by Georgia, stood apart from their northern neighbors. As a historian of colonial Carolina explained, “the southern colonies were never a cohesive section in the same way that New England was. The great diversity of population groups . . . discouraged southern sectionalism.”

Proprietors of the Carolinas
 Carolina was a product of the restoration of the Stuarts to the English throne. Court favorites who had followed the Stuarts into exile during the Civil War demanded tangible rewards for their loyalty. New York and New Jersey were obvious plums. So too was Carolina. Sir John Colleton, a successful English planter returned from Barbados, organized a group of eight powerful courtiers who styled themselves the True and Absolute Lords Proprietors of Carolina. On March 24, 1663, the king granted these proprietors a charter to the vast territory between Virginia and Florida and running west as far as the “South Seas.” The failure of similar ventures in the New World taught the Carolina proprietors valuable lessons. Unlike the first Virginians, for example, this group did not expect instant wealth. Rather, the proprietors reasoned that they would obtain a steady source of income from rents. What they needed, of course, were settlers to pay those rents. Recruitment turned out to be no easy task. Economic and social conditions in the mother country improved considerably after its civil war, and English people were no longer so willing to transfer to the New World. Even if they had shown interest, the cost of transporting settlers across the Atlantic seemed prohibitively

 expensive. The proprietors concluded, therefore, that with the proper incentives—a generous land policy, for example—they could attract men and women from established American colonies and thereby save themselves a great deal of money. Unfortunately for the men who owned Carolina, such people were not easily persuaded. They had begun to take for granted certain rights and privileges, and as the price of settlement, they demanded a representative assembly, liberty of conscience, and a liberal headright system. Colleton and his associates waited for the money to roll in, but to their dismay, no one seemed particularly interested in moving to the Carolina frontier. A tiny settlement at Port Royal failed. One group of New Englanders briefly considered taking up land in the Cape Fear area, but these people were so disappointed by what they saw that they departed, leaving behind only a sign that “tended not only to the disparagement of the Land . . . but also to the great discouragement of all those that should hereafter come into these parts to settle.” By this time, a majority of surviving proprietors had given up on Carolina.

The Barbadian Connection
 Anthony Ashley Cooper, later Earl of Shaftesbury, was the exception. In 1669, he persuaded the remaining Carolinian proprietors to invest their own capital in the colony. Without such financial support, Cooper recognized, the project would surely fail. Once he received sufficient funds, this energetic organizer dispatched three hundred English colonists to Port Royal under the command of Joseph West. The fleet put in briefly at Barbados to pick up additional recruits, and in March 1670, after being punished by Atlantic gales that destroyed one ship, the expedition arrived at its destination. Only one hundred people were still alive. The unhappy settlers did not remain long at Port Royal, an unappealing, low-lying place badly exposed to Spanish attack. They moved northward, locating eventually along the more secure Ashley River. Later the colony’s administrative center, Charles Town (it did not become Charleston until 1783) was established at the junction of the Ashley and Cooper rivers. Cooper also wanted to bring order to the new society. With assistance from John Locke, the famous English philosopher (1632–1704), Cooper devised the Fundamental Constitutions of Carolina. Like Penn, Cooper had been influenced by the writings of Harrington. The constitutions created a local aristocracy consisting of proprietors and lesser nobles called landgraves and cassiques, terms as inappropriate to the realities of the New World as was the idea of creating a hereditary landed elite. Persons who purchased vast tracts of land automatically received a title and the right to sit in the Council of Nobles, a body designed to administer justice, oversee civil affairs, and initiate legislation. A parliament in which smaller landowners had a voice and could accept or reject bills drafted by the council. The very poor were excluded from political life altogether. Cooper thought his scheme maintained the proper “Balance of Government” between aristocracy and democracy, a concept central to Harrington’s philosophy. Not surprisingly, the constitutions had little impact on the actual structure of government.

Planting the Carolinas


 Before 1680, almost half the men and women who settled in the Port Royal area came from Barbados. This small Caribbean island, which produced an annual fortune in sugar, depended on slave labor. By the third quarter of the seventeenth century, Barbados had become overpopulated. Wealthy families could not provide their sons and daughters with sufficient land to maintain social status, and as the crisis intensified, Barbadians looked to Carolina for relief. These migrants, many of whom were quite rich, traveled to Carolina both as individuals and family groups. Some even brought gangs of slaves with them to the American mainland. The Barbadians carved out plantations on the tributaries of the Cooper River and established themselves immediately as the colony’s most powerful political faction. “So it was,” wrote historian Richard



 Dunn, “that these Caribbean pioneers helped to create on the North American coast a slave-based plantation society closer in temper to the islands they fled from than to any other mainland English settlement.” Much of the planters’ time was taken up with the search for a profitable crop. The early settlers experimented with a number of plants: tobacco, cotton, silk, and grapes. The most successful items turned out to be beef, skins, and naval stores (especially tar used to maintain ocean vessels). By the 1680s, some Carolinians had built up great herds of cattle—seven or eight hundred head in some cases. Traders who dealt with Indians brought back thousands of deerskins from the interior, and they often returned with Indian slaves as well. These commercial resources, together with tar and turpentine, enjoyed a good market. It was not until the 1690s that

ENGLAND’S PRINCIPAL MAINLAND COLONIES
Original Purpose 
Virginia
New
Amsterdam
(New York)
Plymouth


 Commercial venture 1607 Commercial venture 1613 (made English colony, 1664)

Captain John Smith
Peter Stuyvesant,
Duke of York


Tobacco
 Furs, grain

64,560
19,107


Refuge for English
 1620 (absorbed by Separatists Massachusetts, 1691) Commercial venture 1623

William Bradford


Grain


John Mason


Refuge for English
Puritans
Refuge for English
Catholics
Expansion of
Massachusetts
 Refuge for dissenters from Massachusetts Commercial venture



John Winthrop


 Wood, naval stores Grain, wood

 Included with Massachusetts 4,958 55,941



Tobacco


34,100




Lord Baltimore
(George Calvert)
Thomas Hooker


Grain


25,970




Roger Williams


Grain


5,894


Peter Minuit,
William Penn


Grain


2,470


Anthony Ashley
Cooper
Anthony Ashley
Cooper
Sir George Carteret


 Wood, naval 10,720 stores, tobacco Naval stores, 5,720 rice, indigo Grain 14,010

William Penn


Grain


18,950


James Oglethorpe


 Rice, wood, naval stores

5,200 (in 1750)


New
Hampshire
Massachusetts
Maryland
Connecticut
Rhode Island
New Sweden
(Delaware)


Date of Founding


North Carolina


 1638 (included in Penn grant, 1681; given separate assembly, 1703) Commercial venture 1663

South Carolina


 Commercial venture 1663

New Jersey


Consolidation of new 1664
 English territory, Quaker settlement Refuge for English Quakers Discourage Spanish 1733 expansion; charity

Pennsylvania
Georgia


Principal Founder Major Export


Estimated
Population ca. 1700


Name


 Sources: U.S. Bureau of the Census, Historical Statistics of the United States: Colonial Times to 1970, Washington, DC, 1975; John J. McCusker and Russell R. Menard, The Economy of British America, 1607–1789, Chapel Hill, 1985.

NEW WORLD EXPERIMENTS: ENGLAND’S SEVENTEENTH-CENTURY COLONIES

 PENNSYLVANIA

CLAIMED BY VIRGINIA

 ee

R.


 AN

Tuscarora
Ca
 NORTH pe CAROLINA

R.


R.


Chattahoochee


Wilmington


Cape Fear


SOUTH CAROLINA

Yamasee


Georgetown


Charles Town
Savannah


Creek
Added to
Georgia, 1763


St. Marks


Albemarle
Sound


R.


New Bern


R.


 d oa Br

 GEORGIA

Chesapeake
Bay


.
 rR

Catawba


Roa
 no ke a Fe

PA
Cherokee 
Williamsburg


 VIRGINIA

D ee


 AP

I
CH LA

TA UN MO

S
 IN

 e Pe

Te
 nn es s

Carolina Grant, 1663


N.J.


Baltimore
 DEL.

Shenandoah R.
James R.


 SPANI

The Founding of Georgia


 MD.

Ohio R
.


R.
 ah nn . va eR Sa l ge mu Oc

 the planters came to appreciate fully the value of rice, but once they had done so, it quickly became the colony’s main staple. Proprietary Carolina was in a constant political uproar. Factions vied for special privilege. The Barbadian settlers, known locally as the Goose Creek Men, resisted the proprietors’ policies at every turn. A large community of French Huguenots located in Craven County distrusted the Barbadians. The proprietors— an ineffectual group following the death of Cooper—appointed a series of utterly incompetent governors who only made things worse. One visitor observed that “the Inhabitants of Carolina should be as free from Oppression as any [people] in the Universe . . . if their own Differences amongst themselves do not occasion the contrary.” By the end of the century, the Commons House of Assembly had assumed the right to initiate legislation. In 1719, the colonists overthrew the last proprietary governor, and in 1729, the king created separate royal governments for North and South Carolina.

R.


CHAPT ER 2

Coo
 sa



ATLANTIC OCEAN

Altamaha R.


 SH

St. Augustine
Timucua


F
Carolina Grant, 1663


 RI

 DA

 The early history of Georgia was strikingly different from that of Britain’s other mainland colonies. Its settlement was really an act of aggression against Spain, a country that had as good a claim to this area as did the English. During the eighteenth century, the two nations were often at war (see Chapter 4), and South Carolinians worried that the Spaniards moving up from bases in Florida would occupy the disputed territory between Florida and the Carolina grant. The colony owed its existence primarily to James Oglethorpe, a British general and member of Parliament who believed that he could thwart Spanish designs on the area south of Charles Town while at the same time providing a fresh start for London’s worthy poor, saving them from debtors’ prison. Although Oglethorpe envisioned Georgia as an asylum as well as a garrison, the military aspects of his proposal were especially appealing to the leaders of the British government. In 1732, the king granted Oglethorpe and a board of trustees a charter for a new colony to be located between the Savannah and Altamaha rivers and from “sea to sea.” The trustees living in the mother country were given complete control over Georgia politics, a condition the settlers soon found intolerable. During the first years of colonization, Georgia fared no better than had earlier utopian experiments. The poor people of England showed little desire to move to an inclement frontier, and the trustees, in their turn, provided little incentive for emigration. Each colonist received only 50 acres. Another 50 acres could be added for each servant transported to Georgia, but in no case could a settler amass more than 500 acres. Moreover, land could be passed only to an eldest son, and if a planter had no sons at the time of his death, the holding reverted to the trustees. Slavery was prohibited. So too was rum. Almost as soon as they arrived in Georgia, the settlers complained. The colonists demanded slaves, pointing out to the

Gulf of Mexico


 LO

 How was the founding of the Carolinas different from the founding of Georgia?

Lake
Okeechobee


 Boundary lines of colonies, 1740



 200 miles 200 kilometers

THE CAROLINAS AND GEORGIA
Caribbean sugar planters migrated to the Goose Creek area where, with knowledge supplied by African slaves, they eventually mastered rice cultivation. Poor harbors in North Carolina retarded the spread of European settlement in that region. 
 trustees that unless the new planters possessed an unfree labor force, they could not compete economically with their South Carolina neighbors. The settlers also wanted a voice in local government. In 1738, 121 people living in Savannah petitioned for fundamental reforms in the colony’s constitution. Oglethorpe responded angrily, “The idle ones are indeed for Negroes. If the petition is countenanced, the province is ruined.” The settlers did not give up. In 1741, they again petitioned Oglethorpe, this time addressing him as “our Perpetual Dictator.” While the colonists grumbled about various restrictions, Oglethorpe tried and failed to capture the Spanish fortress at Saint Augustine (1740). This personal disappointment coupled with the growing popular unrest destroyed his interest in Georgia. The trustees were forced to compromise their principles. In 1738, they eliminated all restrictions on the amount of land a man could own; they allowed women to inherit land. In 1750, they permitted the settlers to import slaves. Soon Georgians could drink rum. In 1751, the trustees returned Georgia to the king, undoubtedly relieved to be free of what had become a hard-drinking, slave-owning plantation society much like that

STUDY RESOURCES

 in South Carolina. The king authorized an assembly in 1751, but even with these social and political changes, Georgia attracted very few new settlers.

 Conclusion: Living with Diversity Long after he had returned from his adventures in Virginia, Captain John Smith reflected on the difficulty of establishing colonies in the New World. It was a task for which most people were not temperamentally suited. “It requires,” Smith counseled, “all the best parts of art, judgment, courage, honesty, constancy, diligence, and industry, [even] to do neere well.” On another occasion, Charles I warned Lord Baltimore that new settlements “commonly have rugged and laborious beginnings.” Over the course of the seventeenth century, women and men had followed leaders such as Baltimore, Smith, Winthrop,



 Bradford, Penn, and Berkeley to the New World in anticipation of creating a successful new society. Some people were religious visionaries; others were hardheaded businessmen. The results of their efforts, their struggles to survive in an often hostile environment, and their interactions with various Native American groups yielded a spectrum of settlements along the Atlantic coast, ranging from the quasifeudalism of South Carolina to the Puritan commonwealth of Massachusetts Bay. The diversity of early English colonization must be emphasized precisely because it is so easy to overlook. Even though the colonists eventually banded together and fought for independence, persistent differences separated New Englanders from Virginians, Pennsylvanians from Carolinians. The interpretive challenge, of course, is to comprehend how European colonists managed over the course of the eighteenth century to overcome fragmentation and to develop the capacity to imagine themselves a nation.

Study
 y Resources Take the Study Plan for Chapter 2 New World Experiments on MyHistoryLab

TIME LINE 1607
First English settlers arrive at Jamestown 1608–1609 Scrooby congregation (Pilgrims) 
 1634 Colony of Maryland is founded 1636 Harvard College is established; Puritan settlers found

 leaves England for Holland

 1609–1611 “Starving time” in Virginia threatens



 survival of the colonists

 1616–1618 Plague destroys Native American populations of coastal New England

 1619 Virginia assembly, called House of Burgesses, meets for the first time; First slaves sold at Jamestown

 1620 Pilgrims sign the Mayflower Compact 1622 Surprise Indian attack devastates Virginia 1624 Dutch investors create permanent settlements along Hudson River; James I, King of England, dissolves Virginia Company

 1625 Charles I ascends English throne 1630 John Winthrop transfers Massachusetts Bay charter to New England



 Hartford and other Connecticut Valley towns Anne Hutchinson exiled to Rhode Island; Theophilus Eaton and John Davenport lead settlers to New Haven Colony Connecticut towns accept Fundamental Orders Second major Indian attack in Virginia Charles I executed during English Civil War Stuarts restored to the English throne Rhode Island obtains royal charter; Proprietors receive charter for Carolina English soldiers conquer New Netherland New Hampshire becomes a royal colony William Penn granted patent for his “Holy Experiment” East and West Jersey unite to form single colony James Oglethorpe receives charter for Georgia



CHAPT ER 2

CHAPTER REVIEW

CHAPTER REVIEW
Breaking Away What were some of the social problems facing Britain in the 16th and 17th centuries that helped push English colonists to cross the Atlantic? 
 the colony, and ethnic rivalries shaped the politics of New York for decades. In 1681, Charles II granted William Penn, a Quaker, a charter to establish Pennsylvania. Penn’s guarantee to respect all Christian settlers’ liberty of conscience drew immigrants from across Northern Europe. (p. 44)

Quakers in America


 Between 1580 and 1650, an expanding population strained England’s agrarian economy. Competition for food and land threatened to disrupt law and order and drove many people to migrate from rural areas to London or across the Atlantic. (p. 30)

Te
 nn es s

 a Fe

Roa
M
Tuscarora
 no N ke Ca R. IA NORTH pe ee CH CAROLINA LA PA Cherokee Catawba AP

R.


R.


Coo
 sa

 hattahoochee

.
 rR

 GEORGIA

W


R.


Ca


SOUTH CAROLINA

Yamasee


Georgeto


Charles Town
Savannah


 How did the Barbadian background of the early settlers shape the economic development of the Carolinas?

 About half the early settlers of Carolina came from Barbados, a British Caribbean island where the economy depended on the production of sugar by slave labor. In the Carolina colony, these migrants recreated a similar slave-based plantation economy that by the 1690s was based primarily on the cultivation of rice as a cash crop. (p. 48) P

Ohio R
.
CLAIMED BY VIRGINIA

The Founding of Georgia


Shenandoah R.


S
 IN

TA UN MO
Tuscarora N C R. IA NORTH ee CH CAROLINA LA PA Cherokee Catawba AP D ee 
R.


 GEORGIA

 How was the founding of the Carolinas different from the founding of Georgia?

R.


R
 ah nn va Sa mu Oc

R.


 e Pe

Te
 nn es s

Carolina Grant, 1663


 d oa Br

 How did ethnic diversity shape the development of the Middle Colonies?

 VIRGINIA

R.


Diversity in the Middle Colonies


Carolina Grant, 1663


R.
 ah nn . va eR Sa lge mu Oc

 Religious persecution drove thousands of Puritans to New England. John Winthrop hoped the settlers would reform English Protestantism and create a “City on a Hill.” The Puritans did not welcome dissent. They exiled Roger Williams and Anne Hutchinson to Rhode Island for their religious beliefs. Stable nuclear families and good health helped Puritans avoid the social turmoil that plagued the Chesapeake colonies. (p. 37)

Planting the Carolinas


James R.


NS AI NT OU

 d oa Br

 How did differences in religion affect the founding of the New England colonies?

M


Shenandoah R.


D ee


Reforming England in America


PENNSYLVAN
Ohio R . 
CLAIMED BY VIRGINIA

 e Pe

 Until tobacco began to be cultivated as a profitable cash crop around 1617, the Virginia colony suffered from disease, hunger, misgovernment, and social dissension. Maryland, which had been founded as a refuge for English Catholics in the late 1630s, and where tobacco also became the economic mainstay, endured decades of political and religious conflict before a stable government was established there in the 1660s. (p. 31)

Coo
 sa

 Why did the Chesapeake colonies not prosper during the earliest years of settlement?

 William Penn, the founder of Pennsylvania, was a Quaker, a Protestant sect that emphasized simplicity and the possibility of salvation for all in religious practice and belief and humility and tolerance in daily life. He guaranteed that settlers in Pennsylvania would enjoy liberty of conscience, freedom from persecution, no taxation without representation, and due process of law. (p. 46)

 ee R .

The Chesapeake: Dreams of Wealth


 How did the Quaker religion influence the development of Pennsylvania?

SOUTH CAROLINA

 Immigrants from Barbados began settling in the Carolinas in the 1670s. Barbadian immigrants to the Carolinas, many of whom were wealthy planters seeking new lands for plantations, brought slavery with them when they moved. Georgia was founded in 1732 as an alternative to debtors’ prison for impoverished Englishmen and as a military outpost to guard against the Spanish in Florida. (p. 50)

 After conquering the Dutch colony of New Netherland in 1664, the English renamed it New York. Despite the conquest, the Dutch remained an influential minority in

KEY TERMS AND DEFINITIONS
Joint-stock company Business enterprise that enabled investors to pool money for commerce and funding for colonies. p. 32 House of Burgesses Virginia. p. 34 
 The elective representative assembly in colonial

 Headright System of land distribution in which settlers were granted a 50-acre plot of land from the colonial government for each servant or dependent they transported to the New World. It encouraged the recruitment of a large servile labor force. p. 34 Mayflower Compact Agreement among the Pilgrims aboard the Mayflower in 1620 to create a civil government at Plymouth Colony. p. 37

 Puritans Members of a reformed Protestant sect in Europe and America that insisted on removing all vestiges of Catholicism from religious practice. p. 37 Great Migration Migration of 16,000 Puritans from England to the Massachusetts Bay Colony during the 1630s. p. 39 Antinomianism Religious belief rejecting traditional moral law as unnecessary for Christians who possess saving grace and affirming that a person could experience divine revelation and salvation without the assistance of formally trained clergy. p. 42 Quakers Members of a radical religious group, formally known as the Society of Friends, that rejects formal theology and stress each person’s “inner light,” a spiritual guide to righteousness. p. 46

STUDY RESOURCES



CRITICAL THINKING QUESTIONS 1.
Would the first Chesapeake colonies have survived if the settlers had 
 3. How did William Penn’s leadership style compare to those of John

 not discovered tobacco as a profitable cash crop?

 2. Would the historical development of New England have been

Winthrop and Captain John Smith?


 4. How were the European migrants who were attracted to Georgia and

 different if the Puritans had developed a profitable cash crop like tobacco or rice?

 the Carolinas different from the migrants from the Chesapeake and Middle Colonies?

 MyHistoryLab Media Assignments Find these resources in the Media Assignments folder for Chapter 2 on MyHistoryLab The Chesapeake: Dreams of Wealth ◾ ◾

View the Map


Diversity in the Middle Colonies


The Colonies to 1740 p. 31


Read the Document


Father Isaac Jogues, Description of


New York, 1640 p. 45


◾


Read the Document


John Smith, “The Starving


Quakers in America


Time” p. 33
Read the Document


James I, “A Counterblaste to


Tobacco” p. 34
Read the Document


Wessell Webling, His Indenture


(1622) p. 35
Read the Document


 George Aslop from, “A Character of the Province of Maryland” p. 36

Reforming England in America
◾


Read the Document


John Wintrhrop, “A Model of
Christian Charity” (1830) p. 38


Complete the Assignment


The Children Who Refused to
Come Home: Captivity and Conversion p. 40


◾


Read the Document


William Penn, “Model for
Government” (1681) p. 46


Read the Document


Letter by William Penn to the
Committee of the Free Society of Traders (1683) p. 47


◾ Indicates Study Plan Media Assignment




Putting Down Roots:
Opportunity and Oppression
 in Colonial Society

Contents and Learning Objectives
SOURCES OF STABILITY: NEW ENGLAND COLONIES OF THE SEVENTEENTH CENTURY PG. 56

RISE OF A COMMERCIAL EMPIRE PG. 66

 What factors explain the remarkable social stability achieved in early New England?

COLONIAL FACTIONS SPARK POLITICAL REVOLT, 1676–1691 PG. 68

THE CHALLENGE OF THE CHESAPEAKE ENVIRONMENT PG. 59

 How did colonial revolts affect the political culture of Virginia and New England?

 What factors contributed to political unrest in the Chesapeake region during this period?

FEATURE ESSAY
Anthony Johnson: A Free Black Planter on Pungoteague Creek 
RACE AND FREEDOM IN BRITISH AMERICA PG. 61
How did African American slaves preserve an independent cultural identity in the New World? 
 Listen to the Audio File on myhistorylab

 Why did England discourage free and open trade in colonial America?

LAW AND SOCIETY
Witches and the Law: A Problem of Evidence in 1692 
